Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF616.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1543YH (1) 91 cm/jh H.F. 616 Section 1. Section 596.5, subsection 1, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0g. Any limitations on the ability of the 3 parties to amend the agreement whether prior to after the 4 solemnization of the marriage except that any amendment must be 5 in writing and signed by both parties. 6 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 596.6A Amendment. 7 Notwithstanding section 597.2, a premarital agreement may 8 be amended after marriage only by a written agreement signed 9 by both spouses which satisfies any additional criteria 10 or limitations of an amendment set forth in the premarital 11 agreement. 12 Sec. 3. Section 596.7, unnumbered paragraph 1, Code 2025, 13 is amended to read as follows: 14 After marriage, a premarital agreement or amendment may be 15 revoked only as follows: 16 Sec. 4. Section 596.7, subsection 2, unnumbered paragraph 17 1, Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 18 To revoke a premarital agreement or an amendment without the 19 consent of the other spouse, the person seeking revocation must 20 prove one or more of the following: 21 Sec. 5. Section 596.8, Code 2025, is amended to read as 22 follows: 23 596.8 Enforcement. 24 1. A premarital agreement or amendment is not enforceable 25 if the person against whom enforcement is sought proves any of 26 the following: 27 a. The person did not execute the agreement or amendment 28 voluntarily. 29 b. The agreement or amendment was unconscionable when it 30 was executed. 31 c. Before the execution of the agreement or amendment the 32 person was not provided a fair and reasonable disclosure of 33 the property or financial obligations of the other spouse; and 34 the person did not have, or reasonably could not have had, an 35 -1- LSB 1543YH (1) 91 cm/jh 1/ 2 H.F. 616 adequate knowledge of the property or financial obligations of 1 the other spouse. 2 2. If a provision of the agreement or amendment or the 3 application of the provision to a party is found by the court 4 to be unenforceable, the provision shall be severed from the 5 remainder of the agreement and shall not affect the provisions, 6 or application, of the agreement which can be given effect 7 without the unenforceable provision. 8 Sec. 6. Section 596.9, Code 2025, is amended to read as 9 follows: 10 596.9 Unconscionability. 11 In any action under this chapter to amend, revoke , or 12 enforce a premarital agreement or amendment, the issue of 13 unconscionability of a premarital agreement or amendment shall 14 be decided by the court as a matter of law. 15 Sec. 7. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to proceedings 16 concerning premarital agreement amendments commenced on or 17 after July 1, 2025. 18